glossing/lexicons/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON PRON-GYM

@D.CASE@.prn%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@о # ;
@D.CASE@.prn%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@ # ;
! .prn%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ык # ;
! .prn%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ыкы # ;
! .prn%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<all%>:ыкагты # ;
! .prn%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<equ%>:ыгмил # ;
.prn%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<der%>%<subst%>:%>нин N-DERIV-SUFF ; ! SPATIAL
.prn%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>: PRON-PERS-CASES ;
@D.CASE@.prn%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:@D.CASE@н POSS ;

LEXICON PRON-GYT

@D.CASE@.prn%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@то # ;
@D.CASE@.prn%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@т # ;
! .prn%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<erg%>:тнан # ;
! .prn%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:тык # ;
! .prn%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:тыкы # ;
! .prn%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<all%>:тыкагты # ;
! .prn%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<equ%>:тыгмил # ;
.prn%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<der%>%<subst%>:%>нин N-DERIV-SUFF ; ! SPATIAL
.prn%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:н PRON-PERS-CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-YTLJON

@D.CASE@.prn%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@тԓён # ;
! .prn%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:нык # ;
! .prn%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:ныкагты # ;
@D.CASE@%<abl%>:@D.CASE@%>нка%>%{G%}%{ы%}п%{ы%}%{⁺ⱽᴴ%} # ;
@D.CASE@%<ori%>:@D.CASE@%>нк%{Æ%}%>%{ы%}гйит # ;
.prn%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:н PRON-PERS-CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-MURI
@D.CASE@.prn%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@и # ;
.prn%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>: PRON-PERS-CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-TURI
@D.CASE@.prn%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@и # ;
.prn%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>: PRON-PERS-CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-YCCI-ABS
@D.CASE@.prn%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@и # ;

LEXICON PRON-YCCI-OBL
.prn%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>: PRON-PERS-CASES ;


LEXICON PRON-PERS-CASES
@D.CASE@%<erg%>:@D.CASE@%>нан # ;
@D.CASE@%<erg%>:@D.CASE@%>ан # ;
@D.CASE@%<ess%>:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}ку # ;
@D.CASE@%<loc%>:@D.CASE@%>%{ы%}к # ;
@D.CASE@%<all%>:@D.CASE@%>ыкы%{⁺ⱽᴴ%} # ;
@D.CASE@%<all%>:@D.CASE@%>ыка%>%{G%}ты%{⁺ⱽᴴ%} # ;
@D.CASE@%<abl%>:@D.CASE@%>ыка%>%{G%}%{ы%}п%{ы%}%{⁺ⱽᴴ%} # ;
@D.CASE@%<ori%>:@D.CASE@%>ык%{Æ%}%>%{ы%}гйит # ;
@D.CASE@%<ine%>:@D.CASE@%>ык%{Æ%}%>%{ы%}чыку # ;
@D.CASE@%<per%>:@D.CASE@%>ык%{Æ%}%>%{ы%}йэквэ%{⁺ⱽᴴ%} # ;
@D.CASE@%<sub%>:@D.CASE@%>ык%{Æ%}%>%{ы%}йиӈкы # ;
@R.CASE.com@%<com%>:@R.CASE.com@%>ык%>%{T%}%{Æ%} # ;
@R.CASE.assoc@%<assoc%>:@R.CASE.assoc@%>ыг%>%{ы%}ма%{⁺ⱽᴴ%} # ;
@R.CASE.prv@%<prv%>:@R.CASE.prv@%>ык%>%{ы%}к%{Æ%} # ;
@D.CASE@:@D.CASE@ POSS ;
@D.CASE@:@D.CASE@%{ы%}к%{Æ%} REL ;
: PRON-REL ;


LEXICON PRON-REL
%<rel%>%<1sg%>:нин%{Æ%}кин N-DERIV-I ;
%<rel%>%<1pl%>:гин%{Æ%}кин N-DERIV-I ;
%<rel%>%<2sg%>:ин%{Æ%}кин N-DERIV-I ;
%<rel%>%<2pl%>:гин%{Æ%}кин N-DERIV-I ;



LEXICON PRON-RXENUT-ABS

@D.CASE@.prn%<itg%>%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@%{·%} # ;

LEXICON PRON-RXENUT-OBL

.prn%<itg%>: CASES-OBL ;
.prn%<itg%>: CASES-ANIM ;


LEXICON PRON-IMYRXENUT-ABS

@D.CASE@.prn%<ind%>%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@%{·%} # ;

LEXICON PRON-IMYRXENUT-OBL

.prn%<ind%>: CASES-OBL ;
.prn%<ind%>: CASES-ANIM ;

LEXICON PRON-YNQEN

@D.CASE@.prn%<dem%>%<sg%>%<abs%>:@D.CASE@%{·%} # ;
.prn%<dem%>: CASES-OBL ;
.prn%<dem%>: CASES-ANIM ;
.prn%<dem%>: POSS ;


LEXICON PRON-YMYLJO

.prn%<quant%>%<sg%>: # ;
.prn%<quant%>: CASES-ANIM ;
.prn%<quant%>: CASES-OBL ;
.prn%<quant%>: POSS ;

LEXICON PRON-QOL-SG

.prn%<quant%>%<sg%>%<abs%>: # ;

LEXICON PRON-QOL ! p.173 Inenlikei

.prn%<quant%>: CASES-OBL ;


LEXICON PRON-CINIT

.prn%<ref%>%<sg%>%<abs%>: # ;
.prn%<ref%>: CASES-OBL ;


LEXICON PRON-AMYNAN

@D.CASE@.prn%<restr%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:@D.CASE@гымнан # ;
@D.CASE@.prn%<restr%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:@D.CASE@гынан # ;
@D.CASE@.prn%<restr%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:@D.CASE@ынан # ;
@D.CASE@.prn%<restr%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:@D.CASE@моргынан # ;
@D.CASE@.prn%<restr%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:@D.CASE@торгынан # ;
@D.CASE@.prn%<restr%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:@D.CASE@ыргынан # ;
@D.CASE@.prn%<restr%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:@D.CASE@ыччынан # ;


LEXICON PRON-ITG
@D.CASE@.prn%<itg%>:@D.CASE@ # ;

! LEXICON PRON                                 !! Generic pronoun [to be categorised]

! .prn: # ;






LEXICON Pronouns

гым:гым PRON-GYM ;
гыт:гы PRON-GYT ;
гыт:гыы PRON-GYT ;  ! Dir/LR
ытԓён:ы PRON-YTLJON ;
мури:мур PRON-MURI ;  ! 1pl
тури:тур PRON-TURI ;  ! 2pl
ыччи:ычч PRON-YCCI-ABS ;     ! 3pl females
ыччи:ычч PRON-YCCI-OBL ;     ! 3pl females
ытри:ытр PRON-YCCI-ABS ;     ! 3pl males
ытри:ырг PRON-YCCI-OBL ;     ! 3pl males


ымыԓьо:ымыԓьо PRON-YMYLJO ;

ӄоԓ:ӄоԓ PRON-QOL-SG ;
ӄоԓ:ӄут PRON-QOL ;


чиниткин:чиниткин PRON-CINIT ; ! "свой"


ӈотӄэн:ӈотӄэна PRON-YNQEN ;
ӈанӄэн:ӈанӄэна PRON-YNQEN ;
ӈаанӄэн:ӈаанӄэна PRON-YNQEN ;
ӈоонӄэн:ӈоонӄэна PRON-YNQEN ;
ынӄэн:ынӄэна PRON-YNQEN ;

мэӈин:мэӈин%{Æ%} PRON-RXENUT-ABS ;     ! кто
мэӈин:мик PRON-RXENUT-OBL ;   ! кто
ръэнут:ръэнут%{Æ%} PRON-RXENUT-ABS ;     ! что
ръэнут:рэӄ PRON-RXENUT-OBL ;  ! что

имыръэнут:имыръэнут%{Æ%} PRON-IMYRXENUT-ABS ;   ! всё
имыръэнут:имырэӄ PRON-IMYRXENUT-OBL ;  ! всё
имымэӈин:имымэӈин%{Æ%} PRON-IMYRXENUT-ABS ;     ! все
имымэӈин:имымик PRON-IMYRXENUT-OBL ;   ! все

ам:ам PRON-AMYNAN ;

эʼми:эʼми PRON-ITG ;    ! где (с существитеԓьными)
